Massachusetts, session 194th, H3657.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “eye”, in line 184, the following words:- of a veteran
who, according to the records of the United States Veterans’ Administration, has been
determined to have a service connected disability rating of 60 per cent or greater and by reason
of service in the armed forces of the United States have suffered from a mental disability.
of 1